Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 22 Solar Rights

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

§ 34-22-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Solar Rights Act”.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 156, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-22-102(a)(v).

§ 34-22-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Solar collector,” except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, is one (1) of the following which is capable of collecting, storing or transmitting at least twenty-five thousand (25,000) BTU’s on a clear winter solstice day:

A wall, clerestory or skylight window designed to transmit solar energy into a structure for heating purposes;

A greenhouse attached to another structure and designed to provide part of the heating load for the structure to which it is attached;

A trombe wall, “drum wall” or other wall or roof structural element designed to collect and transmit solar energy into a structure;

A photovoltaic collector designed to convert solar energy into electric energy;

A plate-type collector designed to use solar energy to heat air, water or other fluids for use in hot water or space heating or for other applications; or

A massive structural element designed to collect solar energy and transmit it to internal spaces for heating.

“Solar right” is a property right to an unobstructed line-of-sight path from a solar collector to the sun which permits radiation from the sun to impinge directly on the solar collector. The extent of the solar right shall be described by that illumination provided by the path of the sun on the winter solstice day which is put to a beneficial use or otherwise limited by this act;

“Winter solstice day” is the solstice on or about December 21 which marks the beginning of winter in the northern hemisphere and is the time when the sun reaches its southernmost point;

“Local government” means a city, town or county;

“This act” means W.S.

34-22-101

through

34-22-106

.

For purposes of this act, “solar collector” shall not include a solar collector that is part of a facility that:

Has a rated power capacity of more than five hundred (500) kilowatts; or

Would result in a surface disturbance equal to or greater than one hundred (100) acres.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 156, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a)(i) substituted “ ‘Solar collector,’ except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, is one” for “ ‘Solar collector’ is one”; and added (b).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-22-103.
Declaration of solar rights.

The beneficial use of solar energy is a property right.

In disputes over the use of solar energy:

Beneficial use shall be the basis, the measure and the limit of the solar right, except as otherwise provided by written contract. If the amount of solar energy which a solar user can beneficially use varies with the season of the year, then the extent of the solar right shall vary likewise;

Priority in time shall have the better right, except as provided in this act; and

Nothing in this act diminishes the right of eminent domain.

Solar rights are property rights and as such shall be freely transferable within the bounds of law.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 156, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 34-22-102(a)(v).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Solar energy: landowner's rights against interference with sunlight desired for purposes of solar energy, 29 ALR4th 349.

§ 34-22-104.
Restrictions on solar rights.

The solar right to radiation of the sun before 9:00 a.m. or after 3:00 p.m. Mountain Standard Time is de minimus and may be infringed without compensation to the owner of the solar collector.

A solar right which is not applied to a beneficial use for a period of five (5) years or more shall be deemed abandoned and without priority.

Solar collectors shall be located on the solar user’s property so as not to unreasonably or unnecessarily restrict the uses of neighboring property. Unless otherwise permitted by the local government, no solar right attaches to a solar collector, or a portion of a solar collector, which would be shaded by a ten (10) foot wall located on the property line on a winter solstice day.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 156, § 1.

§ 34-22-105.
County and municipal authority.

Land-use regulations of local governments may encourage the use of solar energy systems. To encourage the use of solar energy systems, local governments may regulate:

The height, location, setback and energy efficiency of structures;

The height and location of vegetation with respect to property lines;

The platting and orientation of land developments; and

The type and location of energy systems or their components.

The local government shall establish permit systems for the use and application of solar energy. Where a local government establishes a permit system for the use and application of solar energy:

A solar permit shall be granted before a solar right may be established;

The local government shall grant a solar permit to any proposed or existing solar collector which complies with this act. If a local government sets height or locational limits on structures or vegetation, the local government may restrict the solar permit to the airspace above or surrounding the restrictions. The extent of the solar right granted by this act shall not exceed the extent of the solar right granted by the solar permit;

The solar right vests on the date the solar permit is granted. The solar collector shall be put to beneficial use within two (2) years except the local government may allow additional time for good cause shown. The local government shall certify the right and its beneficial use within two (2) years of its vesting;

The priority of new construction with regard to interference in solar rights shall vest as of the date the building permit is applied for;

Cities and towns shall regulate solar rights within their boundaries. Counties shall regulate solar rights within the county and outside city limits. Local governments which agree may regulate solar rights jointly;

Existing solar collector users shall apply for permits within five (5) years after the date permit systems are established by their local governments. The priority date for these solar rights shall be the first date the solar collector was beneficially used.

No local government shall prohibit the construction or use of solar collectors except for reasons of public health and safety or as authorized in W.S.

18-5-501

through

18-5-513

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 156, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) added “or as authorized in W.S.

18-5-501

through

18-5-513

” at the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 34-22-102(a)(v).

§ 34-22-106.
Recording solar rights.

The granting of solar permits and the transfer of solar rights shall be recorded pursuant to W.S.

34-1-101

through

34-1-140

. The instrument granting a solar permit shall include a description of the collector surface, or that portion of the collector surface to which the solar permit is granted. The description shall include the dimensions of the collector surface, the direction of orientation, the height above ground level and the location of the collector on the solar user’s property.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 156, § 1.

Savings clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 156, Laws 1981, provides: “Nothing in this act alters, amends, denies, impairs or modifies a solar right, lease, easement or contract right which has vested prior to the effective date of this act [May 20, 1981].”